District of Columbia statutes.
4-217.03

Administration of benefits.

The Mayor shall:

(1)

Review the plan for each child periodically, but no less frequently than once each year, to assure that he receives proper care and to determine the appropriateness and continued need for placement; and

(2)

Provide services which are designed to improve conditions in the home from which the child was removed and effect his return, or otherwise to make possible his being placed in the home of a relative as specified in title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.).

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1703, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-217.3.